Illinois, session 104th, HB3424.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Rights of Crime Victims and Witnesses Act 5is amended by changing Section 4.5 as follows: 6    (725 ILCS 120/4.5)7    Sec. 4.5. Procedures to implement the rights of crime 8victims. To afford crime victims their rights, law 9enforcement, prosecutors, judges, and corrections will provide 10information, as appropriate, of the following procedures:11    (a) At the request of the crime victim, law enforcement 12authorities investigating the case shall provide notice of the 13status of the investigation, except where the State's Attorney 14determines that disclosure of such information would 15unreasonably interfere with the investigation, until such time 16as the alleged assailant is apprehended or the investigation 17is closed.18    (a-5) When law enforcement authorities reopen a closed 19case to resume investigating, they shall provide notice of the 20reopening of the case, except where the State's Attorney 21determines that disclosure of such information would 22unreasonably interfere with the investigation. 23    (a-6) The Prisoner Review Board shall publish on its   HB3424- 2 -LRB104 08148 RLC 18196 b1official public website and provide to registered victims 2information regarding how to submit a victim impact statement. 3The Prisoner Review Board shall consider victim impact 4statements from any registered victims. Any registered victim, 5including a person who has had a final, plenary, or 6non-emergency order of protection granted under Article 112A 7of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 or under the Illinois 8Domestic Violence Act of 1986, may present victim statements 9that the Prisoner Review Board shall consider in its 10deliberations. 11    (b) The office of the State's Attorney:12        (1) shall provide notice of the filing of an 13    information, the return of an indictment, or the filing of 14    a petition to adjudicate a minor as a delinquent for a 15    violent crime;16        (2) shall provide timely notice of the date, time, and 17    place of court proceedings; of any change in the date, 18    time, and place of court proceedings; and of any 19    cancellation of court proceedings. Notice shall be 20    provided in sufficient time, wherever possible, for the 21    victim to make arrangements to attend or to prevent an 22    unnecessary appearance at court proceedings;23        (3) or victim advocate personnel shall provide 24    information of social services and financial assistance 25    available for victims of crime, including information of 26    how to apply for these services and assistance;  HB3424- 3 -LRB104 08148 RLC 18196 b1        (3.5) or victim advocate personnel shall provide 2    information about available victim services, including 3    referrals to programs, counselors, and agencies that 4    assist a victim to deal with trauma, loss, and grief; 5        (4) shall assist in having any stolen or other 6    personal property held by law enforcement authorities for 7    evidentiary or other purposes returned as expeditiously as 8    possible, pursuant to the procedures set out in Section 9    115-9 of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963;10        (5) or victim advocate personnel shall provide 11    appropriate employer intercession services to ensure that 12    employers of victims will cooperate with the criminal 13    justice system in order to minimize an employee's loss of 14    pay and other benefits resulting from court appearances;15        (6) shall provide, whenever possible, a secure waiting 16    area during court proceedings that does not require 17    victims to be in close proximity to defendants or 18    juveniles accused of a violent crime, and their families 19    and friends;20        (7) shall provide notice to the crime victim of the 21    right to have a translator present at all court 22    proceedings and, in compliance with the federal Americans 23    with Disabilities Act of 1990, the right to communications 24    access through a sign language interpreter or by other 25    means;26        (8) (blank);  HB3424- 4 -LRB104 08148 RLC 18196 b1        (8.5) shall inform the victim of the right to be 2    present at all court proceedings, unless the victim is to 3    testify and the court determines that the victim's 4    testimony would be materially affected if the victim hears 5    other testimony at trial; 6        (9) shall inform the victim of the right to have 7    present at all court proceedings, subject to the rules of 8    evidence and confidentiality, an advocate and other 9    support person of the victim's choice; 10        (9.3) shall inform the victim of the right to retain 11    an attorney, at the victim's own expense, who, upon 12    written notice filed with the clerk of the court and 13    State's Attorney, is to receive copies of all notices, 14    motions, and court orders filed thereafter in the case, in 15    the same manner as if the victim were a named party in the 16    case;17        (9.5) shall inform the victim of (A) the victim's 18    right under Section 6 of this Act to make a statement at 19    the sentencing hearing; (B) the right of the victim's 20    spouse, guardian, parent, grandparent, and other immediate 21    family and household members under Section 6 of this Act 22    to present a statement at sentencing; and (C) if a 23    presentence report is to be prepared, the right of the 24    victim's spouse, guardian, parent, grandparent, and other 25    immediate family and household members to submit 26    information to the preparer of the presentence report   HB3424- 5 -LRB104 08148 RLC 18196 b1    about the effect the offense has had on the victim and the 2    person;3        (10) at the sentencing shall make a good faith attempt 4    to explain the minimum amount of time during which the 5    defendant may actually be physically imprisoned. The 6    Office of the State's Attorney shall further notify the 7    crime victim of the right to request from the Prisoner 8    Review Board or Department of Juvenile Justice information 9    concerning the release of the defendant;10        (11) shall request restitution at sentencing and as 11    part of a plea agreement if the victim requests 12    restitution;13        (12) shall, upon the court entering a verdict of not 14    guilty by reason of insanity, inform the victim of the 15    notification services available from the Department of 16    Human Services, including the statewide telephone number, 17    under subparagraph (d)(2) of this Section; 18        (13) shall provide notice within a reasonable time 19    after receipt of notice from the custodian, of the release 20    of the defendant on pretrial release or personal 21    recognizance or the release from detention of a minor who 22    has been detained;23        (14) shall explain in nontechnical language the 24    details of any plea or verdict of a defendant, or any 25    adjudication of a juvenile as a delinquent;26        (15) shall make all reasonable efforts to consult with   HB3424- 6 -LRB104 08148 RLC 18196 b1    the crime victim before the Office of the State's Attorney 2    makes an offer of a plea bargain to the defendant or enters 3    into negotiations with the defendant concerning a possible 4    plea agreement, and shall consider the written statement, 5    if prepared prior to entering into a plea agreement. The 6    right to consult with the prosecutor does not include the 7    right to veto a plea agreement or to insist the case go to 8    trial. If the State's Attorney has not consulted with the 9    victim prior to making an offer or entering into plea 10    negotiations with the defendant, the Office of the State's 11    Attorney shall notify the victim of the offer or the 12    negotiations within 2 business days and confer with the 13    victim;14        (16) shall provide notice of the ultimate disposition 15    of the cases arising from an indictment or an information, 16    or a petition to have a juvenile adjudicated as a 17    delinquent for a violent crime;18        (17) shall provide notice of any appeal taken by the 19    defendant and information on how to contact the 20    appropriate agency handling the appeal, and how to request 21    notice of any hearing, oral argument, or decision of an 22    appellate court;23        (18) shall provide timely notice of any request for 24    post-conviction review filed by the defendant under 25    Article 122 of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963, and 26    of the date, time and place of any hearing concerning the   HB3424- 7 -LRB104 08148 RLC 18196 b1    petition. Whenever possible, notice of the hearing shall 2    be given within 48 hours of the court's scheduling of the 3    hearing;4        (19) shall forward a copy of any statement presented 5    under Section 6 to the Prisoner Review Board or Department 6    of Juvenile Justice to be considered in making a 7    determination under Section 3-2.5-85 or subsection (b) of 8    Section 3-3-8 of the Unified Code of Corrections;9        (20) shall, within a reasonable time, offer to meet 10    with the crime victim regarding the decision of the 11    State's Attorney not to charge an offense, and shall meet 12    with the victim, if the victim agrees. The victim has a 13    right to have an attorney, advocate, and other support 14    person of the victim's choice attend this meeting with the 15    victim; and16        (21) shall give the crime victim timely notice of any 17    decision not to pursue charges and consider the safety of 18    the victim when deciding how to give such notice. 19    (c) The court shall ensure that the rights of the victim 20are afforded. 21    (c-5) The following procedures shall be followed to afford 22victims the rights guaranteed by Article I, Section 8.1 of the 23Illinois Constitution:24        (1) Written notice. A victim may complete a written 25    notice of intent to assert rights on a form prepared by the 26    Office of the Attorney General and provided to the victim   HB3424- 8 -LRB104 08148 RLC 18196 b1    by the State's Attorney. The victim may at any time 2    provide a revised written notice to the State's Attorney. 3    The State's Attorney shall file the written notice with 4    the court. At the beginning of any court proceeding in 5    which the right of a victim may be at issue, the court and 6    prosecutor shall review the written notice to determine 7    whether the victim has asserted the right that may be at 8    issue.9        (2) Victim's retained attorney. A victim's attorney 10    shall file an entry of appearance limited to assertion of 11    the victim's rights. Upon the filing of the entry of 12    appearance and service on the State's Attorney and the 13    defendant, the attorney is to receive copies of all 14    notices, motions and court orders filed thereafter in the 15    case.16        (3) Standing. The victim has standing to assert the 17    rights enumerated in subsection (a) of Article I, Section 18    8.1 of the Illinois Constitution and the statutory rights 19    under Section 4 of this Act in any court exercising 20    jurisdiction over the criminal case. The prosecuting 21    attorney, a victim, or the victim's retained attorney may 22    assert the victim's rights. The defendant in the criminal 23    case has no standing to assert a right of the victim in any 24    court proceeding, including on appeal.25        (4) Assertion of and enforcement of rights.26            (A) The prosecuting attorney shall assert a   HB3424- 9 -LRB104 08148 RLC 18196 b1        victim's right or request enforcement of a right by 2        filing a motion or by orally asserting the right or 3        requesting enforcement in open court in the criminal 4        case outside the presence of the jury. The prosecuting 5        attorney shall consult with the victim and the 6        victim's attorney regarding the assertion or 7        enforcement of a right. If the prosecuting attorney 8        decides not to assert or enforce a victim's right, the 9        prosecuting attorney shall notify the victim or the 10        victim's attorney in sufficient time to allow the 11        victim or the victim's attorney to assert the right or 12        to seek enforcement of a right.13            (B) If the prosecuting attorney elects not to 14        assert a victim's right or to seek enforcement of a 15        right, the victim or the victim's attorney may assert 16        the victim's right or request enforcement of a right 17        by filing a motion or by orally asserting the right or 18        requesting enforcement in open court in the criminal 19        case outside the presence of the jury.20            (C) If the prosecuting attorney asserts a victim's 21        right or seeks enforcement of a right, unless the 22        prosecuting attorney objects or the trial court does 23        not allow it, the victim or the victim's attorney may 24        be heard regarding the prosecuting attorney's motion 25        or may file a simultaneous motion to assert or request 26        enforcement of the victim's right. If the victim or   HB3424- 10 -LRB104 08148 RLC 18196 b1        the victim's attorney was not allowed to be heard at 2        the hearing regarding the prosecuting attorney's 3        motion, and the court denies the prosecuting 4        attorney's assertion of the right or denies the 5        request for enforcement of a right, the victim or 6        victim's attorney may file a motion to assert the 7        victim's right or to request enforcement of the right 8        within 10 days of the court's ruling. The motion need 9        not demonstrate the grounds for a motion for 10        reconsideration. The court shall rule on the merits of 11        the motion.12            (D) The court shall take up and decide any motion 13        or request asserting or seeking enforcement of a 14        victim's right without delay, unless a specific time 15        period is specified by law or court rule. The reasons 16        for any decision denying the motion or request shall 17        be clearly stated on the record.18            (E) No later than January 1, 2023, the Office of 19        the Attorney General shall: 20                (i) designate an administrative authority 21            within the Office of the Attorney General to 22            receive and investigate complaints relating to the 23            provision or violation of the rights of a crime 24            victim as described in Article I, Section 8.1 of 25            the Illinois Constitution and in this Act;26                (ii) create and administer a course of   HB3424- 11 -LRB104 08148 RLC 18196 b1            training for employees and offices of the State of 2            Illinois that fail to comply with provisions of 3            Illinois law pertaining to the treatment of crime 4            victims as described in Article I, Section 8.1 of 5            the Illinois Constitution and in this Act as 6            required by the court under Section 5 of this Act; 7            and8                (iii) have the authority to make 9            recommendations to employees and offices of the 10            State of Illinois to respond more effectively to 11            the needs of crime victims, including regarding 12            the violation of the rights of a crime victim.13            (F) Crime victims' rights may also be asserted by 14        filing a complaint for mandamus, injunctive, or 15        declaratory relief in the jurisdiction in which the 16        victim's right is being violated or where the crime is 17        being prosecuted. For complaints or motions filed by 18        or on behalf of the victim, the clerk of court shall 19        waive filing fees that would otherwise be owed by the 20        victim for any court filing with the purpose of 21        enforcing crime victims' rights. If the court denies 22        the relief sought by the victim, the reasons for the 23        denial shall be clearly stated on the record in the 24        transcript of the proceedings, in a written opinion, 25        or in the docket entry, and the victim may appeal the 26        circuit court's decision to the appellate court. The   HB3424- 12 -LRB104 08148 RLC 18196 b1        court shall issue prompt rulings regarding victims' 2        rights. Proceedings seeking to enforce victims' rights 3        shall not be stayed or subject to unreasonable delay 4        via continuances. 5        (5) Violation of rights and remedies. 6            (A) If the court determines that a victim's right 7        has been violated, the court shall determine the 8        appropriate remedy for the violation of the victim's 9        right by hearing from the victim and the parties, 10        considering all factors relevant to the issue, and 11        then awarding appropriate relief to the victim.12            (A-5) Consideration of an issue of a substantive 13        nature or an issue that implicates the constitutional 14        or statutory right of a victim at a court proceeding 15        labeled as a status hearing shall constitute a per se 16        violation of a victim's right. 17            (B) The appropriate remedy shall include only 18        actions necessary to provide the victim the right to 19        which the victim was entitled. Remedies may include, 20        but are not limited to: injunctive relief requiring 21        the victim's right to be afforded; declaratory 22        judgment recognizing or clarifying the victim's 23        rights; a writ of mandamus; and may include reopening 24        previously held proceedings; however, in no event 25        shall the court vacate a conviction. Any remedy shall 26        be tailored to provide the victim an appropriate   HB3424- 13 -LRB104 08148 RLC 18196 b1        remedy without violating any constitutional right of 2        the defendant. In no event shall the appropriate 3        remedy to the victim be a new trial or damages.4        The court shall impose a mandatory training course 5    provided by the Attorney General for the employee under 6    item (ii) of subparagraph (E) of paragraph (4), which must 7    be successfully completed within 6 months of the entry of 8    the court order.9        This paragraph (5) takes effect January 2, 2023.10        (6) Right to be heard. Whenever a victim has the right 11    to be heard, the court shall allow the victim to exercise 12    the right in any reasonable manner the victim chooses.13        (7) Right to attend trial. A party must file a written 14    motion to exclude a victim from trial at least 60 days 15    prior to the date set for trial. The motion must state with 16    specificity the reason exclusion is necessary to protect a 17    constitutional right of the party, and must contain an 18    offer of proof. The court shall rule on the motion within 19    30 days. If the motion is granted, the court shall set 20    forth on the record the facts that support its finding 21    that the victim's testimony will be materially affected if 22    the victim hears other testimony at trial.23        (8) Right to have advocate and support person present 24    at court proceedings.25            (A) A party who intends to call an advocate as a 26        witness at trial must seek permission of the court   HB3424- 14 -LRB104 08148 RLC 18196 b1        before the subpoena is issued. The party must file a 2        written motion at least 90 days before trial that sets 3        forth specifically the issues on which the advocate's 4        testimony is sought and an offer of proof regarding 5        (i) the content of the anticipated testimony of the 6        advocate; and (ii) the relevance, admissibility, and 7        materiality of the anticipated testimony. The court 8        shall consider the motion and make findings within 30 9        days of the filing of the motion. If the court finds by 10        a preponderance of the evidence that: (i) the 11        anticipated testimony is not protected by an absolute 12        privilege; and (ii) the anticipated testimony contains 13        relevant, admissible, and material evidence that is 14        not available through other witnesses or evidence, the 15        court shall issue a subpoena requiring the advocate to 16        appear to testify at an in camera hearing. The 17        prosecuting attorney and the victim shall have 15 days 18        to seek appellate review before the advocate is 19        required to testify at an ex parte in camera 20        proceeding. 21            The prosecuting attorney, the victim, and the 22        advocate's attorney shall be allowed to be present at 23        the ex parte in camera proceeding. If, after 24        conducting the ex parte in camera hearing, the court 25        determines that due process requires any testimony 26        regarding confidential or privileged information or   HB3424- 15 -LRB104 08148 RLC 18196 b1        communications, the court shall provide to the 2        prosecuting attorney, the victim, and the advocate's 3        attorney a written memorandum on the substance of the 4        advocate's testimony. The prosecuting attorney, the 5        victim, and the advocate's attorney shall have 15 days 6        to seek appellate review before a subpoena may be 7        issued for the advocate to testify at trial. The 8        presence of the prosecuting attorney at the ex parte 9        in camera proceeding does not make the substance of 10        the advocate's testimony that the court has ruled 11        inadmissible subject to discovery.12            (B) If a victim has asserted the right to have a 13        support person present at the court proceedings, the 14        victim shall provide the name of the person the victim 15        has chosen to be the victim's support person to the 16        prosecuting attorney, within 60 days of trial. The 17        prosecuting attorney shall provide the name to the 18        defendant. If the defendant intends to call the 19        support person as a witness at trial, the defendant 20        must seek permission of the court before a subpoena is 21        issued. The defendant must file a written motion at 22        least 45 days prior to trial that sets forth 23        specifically the issues on which the support person 24        will testify and an offer of proof regarding: (i) the 25        content of the anticipated testimony of the support 26        person; and (ii) the relevance, admissibility, and   HB3424- 16 -LRB104 08148 RLC 18196 b1        materiality of the anticipated testimony.2            If the prosecuting attorney intends to call the 3        support person as a witness during the State's 4        case-in-chief, the prosecuting attorney shall inform 5        the court of this intent in the response to the 6        defendant's written motion. The victim may choose a 7        different person to be the victim's support person. 8        The court may allow the defendant to inquire about 9        matters outside the scope of the direct examination 10        during cross-examination. If the court allows the 11        defendant to do so, the support person shall be 12        allowed to remain in the courtroom after the support 13        person has testified. A defendant who fails to 14        question the support person about matters outside the 15        scope of direct examination during the State's 16        case-in-chief waives the right to challenge the 17        presence of the support person on appeal. The court 18        shall allow the support person to testify if called as 19        a witness in the defendant's case-in-chief or the 20        State's rebuttal.21            If the court does not allow the defendant to 22        inquire about matters outside the scope of the direct 23        examination, the support person shall be allowed to 24        remain in the courtroom after the support person has 25        been called by the defendant or the defendant has 26        rested. The court shall allow the support person to   HB3424- 17 -LRB104 08148 RLC 18196 b1        testify in the State's rebuttal.2            If the prosecuting attorney does not intend to 3        call the support person in the State's case-in-chief, 4        the court shall verify with the support person whether 5        the support person, if called as a witness, would 6        testify as set forth in the offer of proof. If the 7        court finds that the support person would testify as 8        set forth in the offer of proof, the court shall rule 9        on the relevance, materiality, and admissibility of 10        the anticipated testimony. If the court rules the 11        anticipated testimony is admissible, the court shall 12        issue the subpoena. The support person may remain in 13        the courtroom after the support person testifies and 14        shall be allowed to testify in rebuttal.15            If the court excludes the victim's support person 16        during the State's case-in-chief, the victim shall be 17        allowed to choose another support person to be present 18        in court. 19            If the victim fails to designate a support person 20        within 60 days of trial and the defendant has 21        subpoenaed the support person to testify at trial, the 22        court may exclude the support person from the trial 23        until the support person testifies. If the court 24        excludes the support person the victim may choose 25        another person as a support person. 26        (9) Right to notice and hearing before disclosure of   HB3424- 18 -LRB104 08148 RLC 18196 b1    confidential or privileged information or records.2            (A) A defendant who seeks to subpoena testimony or 3        records of or concerning the victim that are 4        confidential or privileged by law must seek permission 5        of the court before the subpoena is issued. The 6        defendant must file a written motion and an offer of 7        proof regarding the relevance, admissibility and 8        materiality of the testimony or records. If the court 9        finds by a preponderance of the evidence that:10                (i) the testimony or records are not protected 11            by an absolute privilege and12                (ii) the testimony or records contain 13            relevant, admissible, and material evidence that 14            is not available through other witnesses or 15            evidence, the court shall issue a subpoena 16            requiring the witness to appear in camera or a 17            sealed copy of the records be delivered to the 18            court to be reviewed in camera. If, after 19            conducting an in camera review of the witness 20            statement or records, the court determines that 21            due process requires disclosure of any potential 22            testimony or any portion of the records, the court 23            shall provide copies of the records that it 24            intends to disclose to the prosecuting attorney 25            and the victim. The prosecuting attorney and the 26            victim shall have 30 days to seek appellate review   HB3424- 19 -LRB104 08148 RLC 18196 b1            before the records are disclosed to the defendant, 2            used in any court proceeding, or disclosed to 3            anyone or in any way that would subject the 4            testimony or records to public review. The 5            disclosure of copies of any portion of the 6            testimony or records to the prosecuting attorney 7            under this Section does not make the records 8            subject to discovery or required to be provided to 9            the defendant.10            (B) A prosecuting attorney who seeks to subpoena 11        information or records concerning the victim that are 12        confidential or privileged by law must first request 13        the written consent of the crime victim. If the victim 14        does not provide such written consent, including where 15        necessary the appropriate signed document required for 16        waiving privilege, the prosecuting attorney must serve 17        the subpoena at least 21 days prior to the date a 18        response or appearance is required to allow the 19        subject of the subpoena time to file a motion to quash 20        or request a hearing. The prosecuting attorney must 21        also send a written notice to the victim at least 21 22        days prior to the response date to allow the victim to 23        file a motion or request a hearing. The notice to the 24        victim shall inform the victim (i) that a subpoena has 25        been issued for confidential information or records 26        concerning the victim, (ii) that the victim has the   HB3424- 20 -LRB104 08148 RLC 18196 b1        right to request a hearing prior to the response date 2        of the subpoena, and (iii) how to request the hearing. 3        The notice to the victim shall also include a copy of 4        the subpoena. If requested, a hearing regarding the 5        subpoena shall occur before information or records are 6        provided to the prosecuting attorney. 7        (10) Right to notice of court proceedings. If the 8    victim is not present at a court proceeding in which a 9    right of the victim is at issue, the court shall ask the 10    prosecuting attorney whether the victim was notified of 11    the time, place, and purpose of the court proceeding and 12    that the victim had a right to be heard at the court 13    proceeding. If the court determines that timely notice was 14    not given or that the victim was not adequately informed 15    of the nature of the court proceeding, the court shall not 16    rule on any substantive issues, accept a plea, or impose a 17    sentence and shall continue the hearing for the time 18    necessary to notify the victim of the time, place and 19    nature of the court proceeding. The time between court 20    proceedings shall not be attributable to the State under 21    Section 103-5 of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963.22        (11) Right to timely disposition of the case. A victim 23    has the right to timely disposition of the case so as to 24    minimize the stress, cost, and inconvenience resulting 25    from the victim's involvement in the case. Before ruling 26    on a motion to continue trial or other court proceeding,   HB3424- 21 -LRB104 08148 RLC 18196 b1    the court shall inquire into the circumstances for the 2    request for the delay and, if the victim has provided 3    written notice of the assertion of the right to a timely 4    disposition, and whether the victim objects to the delay. 5    If the victim objects, the prosecutor shall inform the 6    court of the victim's objections. If the prosecutor has 7    not conferred with the victim about the continuance, the 8    prosecutor shall inform the court of the attempts to 9    confer. If the court finds the attempts of the prosecutor 10    to confer with the victim were inadequate to protect the 11    victim's right to be heard, the court shall give the 12    prosecutor at least 3 but not more than 5 business days to 13    confer with the victim. In ruling on a motion to continue, 14    the court shall consider the reasons for the requested 15    continuance, the number and length of continuances that 16    have been granted, the victim's objections and procedures 17    to avoid further delays. If a continuance is granted over 18    the victim's objection, the court shall specify on the 19    record the reasons for the continuance and the procedures 20    that have been or will be taken to avoid further delays.21        (12) Right to Restitution.22            (A) If the victim has asserted the right to 23        restitution and the amount of restitution is known at 24        the time of sentencing, the court shall enter the 25        judgment of restitution at the time of sentencing. 26            (B) If the victim has asserted the right to   HB3424- 22 -LRB104 08148 RLC 18196 b1        restitution and the amount of restitution is not known 2        at the time of sentencing, the prosecutor shall, 3        within 5 days after sentencing, notify the victim what 4        information and documentation related to restitution 5        is needed and that the information and documentation 6        must be provided to the prosecutor within 45 days 7        after sentencing. Failure to timely provide 8        information and documentation related to restitution 9        shall be deemed a waiver of the right to restitution. 10        The prosecutor shall file and serve within 60 days 11        after sentencing a proposed judgment for restitution 12        and a notice that includes information concerning the 13        identity of any victims or other persons seeking 14        restitution, whether any victim or other person 15        expressly declines restitution, the nature and amount 16        of any damages together with any supporting 17        documentation, a restitution amount recommendation, 18        and the names of any co-defendants and their case 19        numbers. Within 30 days after receipt of the proposed 20        judgment for restitution, the defendant shall file any 21        objection to the proposed judgment, a statement of 22        grounds for the objection, and a financial statement. 23        If the defendant does not file an objection, the court 24        may enter the judgment for restitution without further 25        proceedings. If the defendant files an objection and 26        either party requests a hearing, the court shall   HB3424- 23 -LRB104 08148 RLC 18196 b1        schedule a hearing. 2        (13) Access to presentence reports.3            (A) The victim may request a copy of the 4        presentence report prepared under the Unified Code of 5        Corrections from the State's Attorney. The State's 6        Attorney shall redact the following information before 7        providing a copy of the report:8                (i) the defendant's mental history and 9            condition;10                (ii) any evaluation prepared under subsection 11            (b) or (b-5) of Section 5-3-2; and12                (iii) the name, address, phone number, and 13            other personal information about any other victim.14            (B) The State's Attorney or the defendant may 15        request the court redact other information in the 16        report that may endanger the safety of any person.17            (C) The State's Attorney may orally disclose to 18        the victim any of the information that has been 19        redacted if there is a reasonable likelihood that the 20        information will be stated in court at the sentencing.21            (D) The State's Attorney must advise the victim 22        that the victim must maintain the confidentiality of 23        the report and other information. Any dissemination of 24        the report or information that was not stated at a 25        court proceeding constitutes indirect criminal 26        contempt of court.   HB3424- 24 -LRB104 08148 RLC 18196 b1        (14) Appellate relief. If the trial court denies the 2    relief requested, the victim, the victim's attorney, or 3    the prosecuting attorney may file an appeal within 30 days 4    of the trial court's ruling. The trial or appellate court 5    may stay the court proceedings if the court finds that a 6    stay would not violate a constitutional right of the 7    defendant. If the appellate court denies the relief 8    sought, the reasons for the denial shall be clearly stated 9    in a written opinion. In any appeal in a criminal case, the 10    State may assert as error the court's denial of any crime 11    victim's right in the proceeding to which the appeal 12    relates.13        (15) Limitation on appellate relief. In no case shall 14    an appellate court provide a new trial to remedy the 15    violation of a victim's right. 16        (16) The right to be reasonably protected from the 17    accused throughout the criminal justice process and the 18    right to have the safety of the victim and the victim's 19    family considered in determining whether to release the 20    defendant, and setting conditions of release after arrest 21    and conviction. A victim of domestic violence, a sexual 22    offense, or stalking may request the entry of a protective 23    order under Article 112A of the Code of Criminal Procedure 24    of 1963. 25    (d) Procedures after the imposition of sentence.26        (1) The Prisoner Review Board shall inform a victim or   HB3424- 25 -LRB104 08148 RLC 18196 b1    any other concerned citizen, upon written request, of the 2    prisoner's release on parole, mandatory supervised 3    release, electronic detention, work release, international 4    transfer or exchange, or by the custodian, other than the 5    Department of Juvenile Justice, of the discharge of any 6    individual who was adjudicated a delinquent for a crime 7    from State custody and by the sheriff of the appropriate 8    county of any such person's final discharge from county 9    custody. The Prisoner Review Board, upon written request, 10    shall provide to a victim or any other concerned citizen a 11    recent photograph of any person convicted of a felony, 12    upon his or her release from custody. The Prisoner Review 13    Board, upon written request, shall inform a victim or any 14    other concerned citizen when feasible at least 7 days 15    prior to the prisoner's release on furlough of the times 16    and dates of such furlough. Upon written request by the 17    victim or any other concerned citizen, the State's 18    Attorney shall notify the person once of the times and 19    dates of release of a prisoner sentenced to periodic 20    imprisonment. Notification shall be based on the most 21    recent information as to the victim's or other concerned 22    citizen's residence or other location available to the 23    notifying authority. 24        (1.5) At least 48 hours prior to early release of the 25    prisoner from State custody or of the prisoner's pardon, 26    commutation, furlough, or granting of sentence credit, the   HB3424- 26 -LRB104 08148 RLC 18196 b1    Prisoner Review Board shall inform a victim of the release 2    if the victim has previously requested notification of 3    that information. Notification shall be made before 5 p.m. 4    on weekdays. The notice shall include contact information 5    for the Prisoner Review Board. The notification shall be 6    based upon the most recent information as to the victim's 7    residence or other location available to the Board. When 8    no such information is available, the Board shall make all 9    reasonable efforts to obtain the information and make the 10    notification. This notification requirement is in addition 11    to any notification requirements pursuant to any other 12    statewide victim notification systems. The Board must 13    document notification efforts if that victim alleges lack 14    of notification under this paragraph (1.5). 15        (2) When the defendant has been committed to the 16    Department of Human Services pursuant to Section 5-2-4 or 17    any other provision of the Unified Code of Corrections, 18    the victim may request to be notified by the releasing 19    authority of the approval by the court of an on-grounds 20    pass, a supervised off-grounds pass, an unsupervised 21    off-grounds pass, or conditional release; the release on 22    an off-grounds pass; the return from an off-grounds pass; 23    transfer to another facility; conditional release; escape; 24    death; or final discharge from State custody. The 25    Department of Human Services shall establish and maintain 26    a statewide telephone number to be used by victims to make   HB3424- 27 -LRB104 08148 RLC 18196 b1    notification requests under these provisions and shall 2    publicize this telephone number on its website and to the 3    State's Attorney of each county.4        (3) In the event of an escape from State custody, the 5    Department of Corrections or the Department of Juvenile 6    Justice immediately shall notify the Prisoner Review Board 7    of the escape and the Prisoner Review Board shall notify 8    the victim. The notification shall be based upon the most 9    recent information as to the victim's residence or other 10    location available to the Board. When no such information 11    is available, the Board shall make all reasonable efforts 12    to obtain the information and make the notification. When 13    the escapee is apprehended, the Department of Corrections 14    or the Department of Juvenile Justice immediately shall 15    notify the Prisoner Review Board and the Board shall 16    notify the victim.17        (4) The victim of the crime for which the prisoner has 18    been sentenced has the right to register with the Prisoner 19    Review Board's victim registry. Victims registered with 20    the Board shall receive reasonable written notice not less 21    than 30 days prior to the parole hearing or target 22    aftercare release date. The victim has the right to submit 23    a victim statement for consideration by the Prisoner 24    Review Board or the Department of Juvenile Justice in 25    writing, on film, videotape, or other electronic means, or 26    in the form of a recording prior to the parole hearing or   HB3424- 28 -LRB104 08148 RLC 18196 b1    target aftercare release date, or in person at the parole 2    hearing or aftercare release protest hearing, or by 3    calling the toll-free number established in subsection (f) 4    of this Section. The victim shall be notified within 7 5    days after the prisoner has been granted parole or 6    aftercare release and shall be informed of the right to 7    inspect the registry of parole decisions, established 8    under subsection (g) of Section 3-3-5 of the Unified Code 9    of Corrections. The provisions of this paragraph (4) are 10    subject to the Open Parole Hearings Act. Victim statements 11    provided to the Board shall be confidential and 12    privileged, including any statements received prior to 13    January 1, 2020 (the effective date of Public Act 14    101-288), except if the statement was an oral statement 15    made by the victim at a hearing open to the public.16        (4-1) The crime victim has the right to submit a 17    victim statement for consideration by the Prisoner Review 18    Board or the Department of Juvenile Justice prior to or at 19    a hearing to determine the conditions of mandatory 20    supervised release of a person sentenced to a determinate 21    sentence or at a hearing on revocation of mandatory 22    supervised release of a person sentenced to a determinate 23    sentence. A victim statement may be submitted in writing, 24    on film, videotape, or other electronic means, or in the 25    form of a recording, or orally at a hearing, or by calling 26    the toll-free number established in subsection (f) of this   HB3424- 29 -LRB104 08148 RLC 18196 b1    Section. Victim statements provided to the Board shall be 2    confidential and privileged, including any statements 3    received prior to January 1, 2020 (the effective date of 4    Public Act 101-288), except if the statement was an oral 5    statement made by the victim at a hearing open to the 6    public. 7        (4-2) The crime victim has the right to submit a 8    victim statement to the Prisoner Review Board for 9    consideration at an executive clemency hearing as provided 10    in Section 3-3-13 of the Unified Code of Corrections. A 11    victim statement may be submitted in writing, on film, 12    videotape, or other electronic means, or in the form of a 13    recording prior to a hearing, or orally at a hearing, or by 14    calling the toll-free number established in subsection (f) 15    of this Section. Victim statements provided to the Board 16    shall be confidential and privileged, including any 17    statements received prior to January 1, 2020 (the 18    effective date of Public Act 101-288), except if the 19    statement was an oral statement made by the victim at a 20    hearing open to the public. 21        (5) If a statement is presented under Section 6, the 22    Prisoner Review Board or Department of Juvenile Justice 23    shall inform the victim of any order of discharge pursuant 24    to Section 3-2.5-85 or 3-3-8 of the Unified Code of 25    Corrections.26        (6) At the written or oral request of the victim of the   HB3424- 30 -LRB104 08148 RLC 18196 b1    crime for which the prisoner was sentenced or the State's 2    Attorney of the county where the person seeking parole or 3    aftercare release was prosecuted, the Prisoner Review 4    Board or Department of Juvenile Justice shall notify the 5    victim and the State's Attorney of the county where the 6    person seeking parole or aftercare release was prosecuted 7    of the death of the prisoner if the prisoner died while on 8    parole or aftercare release or mandatory supervised 9    release.10        (7) When a defendant who has been committed to the 11    Department of Corrections, the Department of Juvenile 12    Justice, or the Department of Human Services is released 13    or discharged and subsequently committed to the Department 14    of Human Services as a sexually violent person and the 15    victim had requested to be notified by the releasing 16    authority of the defendant's discharge, conditional 17    release, death, or escape from State custody, the 18    releasing authority shall provide to the Department of 19    Human Services such information that would allow the 20    Department of Human Services to contact the victim.21        (8) When a defendant has been convicted of a sex 22    offense as defined in Section 2 of the Sex Offender 23    Registration Act and has been sentenced to the Department 24    of Corrections or the Department of Juvenile Justice, the 25    Prisoner Review Board or the Department of Juvenile 26    Justice shall notify the victim of the sex offense of the   HB3424- 31 -LRB104 08148 RLC 18196 b1    prisoner's eligibility for release on parole, aftercare 2    release, mandatory supervised release, electronic 3    detention, work release, international transfer or 4    exchange, or by the custodian of the discharge of any 5    individual who was adjudicated a delinquent for a sex 6    offense from State custody and by the sheriff of the 7    appropriate county of any such person's final discharge 8    from county custody. The notification shall be made to the 9    victim at least 30 days, whenever possible, before release 10    of the sex offender. 11    (e) The officials named in this Section may satisfy some 12or all of their obligations to provide notices and other 13information through participation in a statewide victim and 14witness notification system established by the Attorney 15General under Section 8.5 of this Act.16    (f) The Prisoner Review Board shall establish a toll-free 17number that may be accessed by the crime victim to present a 18victim statement to the Board in accordance with paragraphs 19(4), (4-1), and (4-2) of subsection (d).20(Source: P.A. 101-81, eff. 7-12-19; 101-288, eff. 1-1-20; 21101-652, eff. 1-1-23; 102-22, eff. 6-25-21; 102-558, eff. 228-20-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22.) 23    Section 10. The Unified Code of Corrections is amended by 24changing Sections 3-3-2, 3-3-9, and 3-14-1 and by adding 25Section 3-3-1.1 as follows:   HB3424- 32 -LRB104 08148 RLC 18196 b1    (730 ILCS 5/3-3-1.1 new)2    Sec. 3-3-1.1. Mission of the Prisoner Review Board. The 3mission of the Prisoner Review Board is to protect the rights 4of victims of crime, their families, and the citizens of 5Illinois by ensuring that the rule of law is upheld and justice 6is carried out. The Board has the responsibility to consider 7the statements of the victims, their family members, and 8public safety officials when an inmate's situation is being 9reviewed by the Board. The Board has the ability to impose 10release conditions for incarcerated individuals who are 11exiting penal facilities, revoke and restore good conduct 12credits from inmates, and conduct hearings to determine 13whether parolees have violated conditions of parole. The 14Board, in its determinations, shall award significant weight 15to the statements and positions of victims and their family 16members in recommending parole. The Board also has the power 17to make recommendations to the Governor relative to clemency 18petitions for those convicted of violating Illinois laws. 19    (730 ILCS 5/3-3-2)  (from Ch. 38, par. 1003-3-2)20    Sec. 3-3-2. Powers and duties. 21    (a) The Parole and Pardon Board is abolished and the term 22"Parole and Pardon Board" as used in any law of Illinois, shall 23read "Prisoner Review Board." After February 1, 1978 (the 24effective date of Public Act 81-1099), the Prisoner Review   HB3424- 33 -LRB104 08148 RLC 18196 b1Board shall provide by rule for the orderly transition of all 2files, records, and documents of the Parole and Pardon Board 3and for such other steps as may be necessary to effect an 4orderly transition and shall:5        (1) hear by at least one member and through a panel of 6    at least 3 members decide, cases of prisoners who were 7    sentenced under the law in effect prior to February 1, 8    1978 (the effective date of Public Act 81-1099), and who 9    are eligible for parole;10        (2) hear by at least one member and through a panel of 11    at least 3 members decide, the conditions of parole and 12    the time of discharge from parole, impose sanctions for 13    violations of parole, and revoke parole for those 14    sentenced under the law in effect prior to February 1, 15    1978 (the effective date of Public Act 81-1099); provided 16    that the decision to parole and the conditions of parole 17    for all prisoners who were sentenced for first degree 18    murder or who received a minimum sentence of 20 years or 19    more under the law in effect prior to February 1, 1978 20    shall be determined by a majority vote of the Prisoner 21    Review Board. One representative supporting parole and one 22    representative opposing parole will be allowed to speak. 23    Their comments shall be limited to making corrections and 24    filling in omissions to the Board's presentation and 25    discussion;26        (3) hear by at least one member and through a panel of   HB3424- 34 -LRB104 08148 RLC 18196 b1    at least 3 members decide, the conditions of mandatory 2    supervised release and the time of discharge from 3    mandatory supervised release, impose sanctions for 4    violations of mandatory supervised release, and revoke 5    mandatory supervised release for those sentenced under the 6    law in effect after February 1, 1978 (the effective date 7    of Public Act 81-1099);8        (3.5) hear by at least one member and through a panel 9    of at least 3 members decide, the conditions of mandatory 10    supervised release and the time of discharge from 11    mandatory supervised release, to impose sanctions for 12    violations of mandatory supervised release and revoke 13    mandatory supervised release for those serving extended 14    supervised release terms pursuant to paragraph (4) of 15    subsection (d) of Section 5-8-1; 16        (3.6) hear by at least one member and through a panel 17    of at least 3 members decide whether to revoke aftercare 18    release for those committed to the Department of Juvenile 19    Justice under the Juvenile Court Act of 1987; 20        (4) hear by at least one member and through a panel of 21    at least 3 members, decide cases brought by the Department 22    of Corrections against a prisoner in the custody of the 23    Department for alleged violation of Department rules with 24    respect to sentence credits under Section 3-6-3 of this 25    Code in which the Department seeks to revoke sentence 26    credits, if the amount of time at issue exceeds 30 days or   HB3424- 35 -LRB104 08148 RLC 18196 b1    when, during any 12-month period, the cumulative amount of 2    credit revoked exceeds 30 days except where the infraction 3    is committed or discovered within 60 days of scheduled 4    release. In such cases, the Department of Corrections may 5    revoke up to 30 days of sentence credit. The Board may 6    subsequently approve the revocation of additional sentence 7    credit, if the Department seeks to revoke sentence credit 8    in excess of 30 days. However, the Board shall not be 9    empowered to review the Department's decision with respect 10    to the loss of 30 days of sentence credit for any prisoner 11    or to increase any penalty beyond the length requested by 12    the Department;13        (5) hear by at least one member and through a panel of 14    at least 3 members decide, the release dates for certain 15    prisoners sentenced under the law in existence prior to 16    February 1, 1978 (the effective date of Public Act 17    81-1099), in accordance with Section 3-3-2.1 of this Code;18        (6) hear by at least one member and through a panel of 19    at least 3 members decide, all requests for pardon, 20    reprieve or commutation, and make confidential 21    recommendations to the Governor;22        (6.5) hear by at least one member who is qualified in 23    the field of juvenile matters and through a panel of at 24    least 3 members, 2 of whom are qualified in the field of 25    juvenile matters, decide parole review cases in accordance 26    with Section 5-4.5-115 of this Code and make release   HB3424- 36 -LRB104 08148 RLC 18196 b1    determinations of persons under the age of 21 at the time 2    of the commission of an offense or offenses, other than 3    those persons serving sentences for first degree murder or 4    aggravated criminal sexual assault; 5        (6.6) hear by at least a quorum of the Prisoner Review 6    Board and decide by a majority of members present at the 7    hearing, in accordance with Section 5-4.5-115 of this 8    Code, release determinations of persons under the age of 9    21 at the time of the commission of an offense or offenses 10    of those persons serving sentences for first degree murder 11    or aggravated criminal sexual assault; 12        (7) comply with the requirements of the Open Parole 13    Hearings Act;14        (8) hear by at least one member and, through a panel of 15    at least 3 members, decide cases brought by the Department 16    of Corrections against a prisoner in the custody of the 17    Department for court dismissal of a frivolous lawsuit 18    pursuant to Section 3-6-3(d) of this Code in which the 19    Department seeks to revoke up to 180 days of sentence 20    credit, and if the prisoner has not accumulated 180 days 21    of sentence credit at the time of the dismissal, then all 22    sentence credit accumulated by the prisoner shall be 23    revoked;24        (9) hear by at least 3 members, and, through a panel of 25    at least 3 members, decide whether to grant certificates 26    of relief from disabilities or certificates of good   HB3424- 37 -LRB104 08148 RLC 18196 b1    conduct as provided in Article 5.5 of Chapter V;2        (9.1) notify the victim in the underlying case of the 3    offender's release on mandatory supervised release at 4    least 30 days prior to release and allow the victim to 5    provide a victim's statement to the Board. The victim's 6    statement shall be considered when determining the 7    conditions of the offender's mandatory supervised release; 8    and 9        (10) upon a petition by a person who has been 10    convicted of a Class 3 or Class 4 felony and who meets the 11    requirements of this paragraph, hear by at least 3 members 12    and, with the unanimous vote of a panel of 3 members, issue 13    a certificate of eligibility for sealing recommending that 14    the court order the sealing of all official records of the 15    arresting authority, the circuit court clerk, and the 16    Illinois State Police concerning the arrest and conviction 17    for the Class 3 or 4 felony. A person may not apply to the 18    Board for a certificate of eligibility for sealing:19            (A) until 5 years have elapsed since the 20        expiration of his or her sentence;21            (B) until 5 years have elapsed since any arrests 22        or detentions by a law enforcement officer for an 23        alleged violation of law, other than a petty offense, 24        traffic offense, conservation offense, or local 25        ordinance offense;26            (C) if convicted of a violation of the Cannabis   HB3424- 38 -LRB104 08148 RLC 18196 b1        Control Act, Illinois Controlled Substances Act, the 2        Methamphetamine Control and Community Protection Act, 3        the Methamphetamine Precursor Control Act, or the 4        Methamphetamine Precursor Tracking Act unless the 5        petitioner has completed a drug abuse program for the 6        offense on which sealing is sought and provides proof 7        that he or she has completed the program successfully;8            (D) if convicted of:9                (i) a sex offense described in Article 11 or 10            Sections 12-13, 12-14, 12-14.1, 12-15, or 12-16 of 11            the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 12            2012;13                (ii) aggravated assault;14                (iii) aggravated battery;15                (iv) domestic battery;16                (v) aggravated domestic battery;17                (vi) violation of an order of protection;18                (vii) an offense under the Criminal Code of 19            1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012 involving a 20            firearm; 21                (viii) driving while under the influence of 22            alcohol, other drug or drugs, intoxicating 23            compound or compounds, or any combination thereof;24                (ix) aggravated driving while under the 25            influence of alcohol, other drug or drugs, 26            intoxicating compound or compounds, or any   HB3424- 39 -LRB104 08148 RLC 18196 b1            combination thereof; or2                (x) any crime defined as a crime of violence 3            under Section 2 of the Crime Victims Compensation 4            Act.5        If a person has applied to the Board for a certificate 6    of eligibility for sealing and the Board denies the 7    certificate, the person must wait at least 4 years before 8    filing again or filing for pardon from the Governor unless 9    the Chairman of the Prisoner Review Board grants a waiver.10        The decision to issue or refrain from issuing a 11    certificate of eligibility for sealing shall be at the 12    Board's sole discretion, and shall not give rise to any 13    cause of action against either the Board or its members.14        The Board may only authorize the sealing of Class 3 15    and 4 felony convictions of the petitioner from one 16    information or indictment under this paragraph (10). A 17    petitioner may only receive one certificate of eligibility 18    for sealing under this provision for life; and19        (11) upon a petition by a person who after having been 20    convicted of a Class 3 or Class 4 felony thereafter served 21    in the United States Armed Forces or National Guard of 22    this or any other state and had received an honorable 23    discharge from the United States Armed Forces or National 24    Guard or who at the time of filing the petition is enlisted 25    in the United States Armed Forces or National Guard of 26    this or any other state and served one tour of duty and who   HB3424- 40 -LRB104 08148 RLC 18196 b1    meets the requirements of this paragraph, hear by at least 2    3 members and, with the unanimous vote of a panel of 3 3    members, issue a certificate of eligibility for 4    expungement recommending that the court order the 5    expungement of all official records of the arresting 6    authority, the circuit court clerk, and the Illinois State 7    Police concerning the arrest and conviction for the Class 8    3 or 4 felony. A person may not apply to the Board for a 9    certificate of eligibility for expungement:10            (A) if convicted of:11                (i) a sex offense described in Article 11 or 12            Sections 12-13, 12-14, 12-14.1, 12-15, or 12-16 of 13            the Criminal Code of 1961 or Criminal Code of 14            2012;15                (ii) an offense under the Criminal Code of 16            1961 or Criminal Code of 2012 involving a firearm; 17            or18                (iii) a crime of violence as defined in 19            Section 2 of the Crime Victims Compensation Act; 20            or21            (B) if the person has not served in the United 22        States Armed Forces or National Guard of this or any 23        other state or has not received an honorable discharge 24        from the United States Armed Forces or National Guard 25        of this or any other state or who at the time of the 26        filing of the petition is serving in the United States   HB3424- 41 -LRB104 08148 RLC 18196 b1        Armed Forces or National Guard of this or any other 2        state and has not completed one tour of duty.3        If a person has applied to the Board for a certificate 4    of eligibility for expungement and the Board denies the 5    certificate, the person must wait at least 4 years before 6    filing again or filing for a pardon with authorization for 7    expungement from the Governor unless the Governor or 8    Chairman of the Prisoner Review Board grants a waiver. 9    (a-5) The Prisoner Review Board, with the cooperation of 10and in coordination with the Department of Corrections and the 11Department of Central Management Services, shall implement a 12pilot project in 3 correctional institutions providing for the 13conduct of hearings under paragraphs (1) and (4) of subsection 14(a) of this Section through interactive video conferences. The 15project shall be implemented within 6 months after January 1, 161997 (the effective date of Public Act 89-490). Within 6 17months after the implementation of the pilot project, the 18Prisoner Review Board, with the cooperation of and in 19coordination with the Department of Corrections and the 20Department of Central Management Services, shall report to the 21Governor and the General Assembly regarding the use, costs, 22effectiveness, and future viability of interactive video 23conferences for Prisoner Review Board hearings.24    (b) Upon recommendation of the Department the Board may 25restore sentence credit previously revoked.26    (c) The Board shall cooperate with the Department in   HB3424- 42 -LRB104 08148 RLC 18196 b1promoting an effective system of parole and mandatory 2supervised release.3    (d) The Board shall promulgate rules for the conduct of 4its work, and the Chairman shall file a copy of such rules and 5any amendments thereto with the Director and with the 6Secretary of State.7    (e) The Board shall keep records of all of its official 8actions and shall make them accessible in accordance with law 9and the rules of the Board.10    (f) The Board or one who has allegedly violated the 11conditions of his or her parole, aftercare release, or 12mandatory supervised release may require by subpoena the 13attendance and testimony of witnesses and the production of 14documentary evidence relating to any matter under 15investigation or hearing. The Chairman of the Board may sign 16subpoenas which shall be served by any agent or public 17official authorized by the Chairman of the Board, or by any 18person lawfully authorized to serve a subpoena under the laws 19of the State of Illinois. The attendance of witnesses, and the 20production of documentary evidence, may be required from any 21place in the State to a hearing location in the State before 22the Chairman of the Board or his or her designated agent or 23agents or any duly constituted Committee or Subcommittee of 24the Board. Witnesses so summoned shall be paid the same fees 25and mileage that are paid witnesses in the circuit courts of 26the State, and witnesses whose depositions are taken and the   HB3424- 43 -LRB104 08148 RLC 18196 b1persons taking those depositions are each entitled to the same 2fees as are paid for like services in actions in the circuit 3courts of the State. Fees and mileage shall be vouchered for 4payment when the witness is discharged from further 5attendance.6    In case of disobedience to a subpoena, the Board may 7petition any circuit court of the State for an order requiring 8the attendance and testimony of witnesses or the production of 9documentary evidence or both. A copy of such petition shall be 10served by personal service or by registered or certified mail 11upon the person who has failed to obey the subpoena, and such 12person shall be advised in writing that a hearing upon the 13petition will be requested in a court room to be designated in 14such notice before the judge hearing motions or extraordinary 15remedies at a specified time, on a specified date, not less 16than 10 nor more than 15 days after the deposit of the copy of 17the written notice and petition in the U.S. mail addressed to 18the person at his or her last known address or after the 19personal service of the copy of the notice and petition upon 20such person. The court upon the filing of such a petition, may 21order the person refusing to obey the subpoena to appear at an 22investigation or hearing, or to there produce documentary 23evidence, if so ordered, or to give evidence relative to the 24subject matter of that investigation or hearing. Any failure 25to obey such order of the circuit court may be punished by that 26court as a contempt of court.  HB3424- 44 -LRB104 08148 RLC 18196 b1    Each member of the Board and any hearing officer 2designated by the Board shall have the power to administer 3oaths and to take the testimony of persons under oath.4    (g) Except under subsection (a) of this Section, a 5majority of the members then appointed to the Prisoner Review 6Board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of all 7business of the Board.8    (h) The Prisoner Review Board shall annually transmit to 9the Director a detailed report of its work for the preceding 10calendar year. The annual report shall also be transmitted to 11the Governor for submission to the Legislature.12(Source: P.A. 101-288, eff. 1-1-20; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 13102-558, eff. 8-20-21.) 14    (730 ILCS 5/3-3-9)  (from Ch. 38, par. 1003-3-9)15    Sec. 3-3-9. Violations; changes of conditions; preliminary 16hearing; revocation of parole or mandatory supervised release; 17revocation hearing.18    (a) If prior to expiration or termination of the term of 19parole or mandatory supervised release, a person violates a 20condition set by the Prisoner Review Board or a condition of 21parole or mandatory supervised release under Section 3-3-7 of 22this Code to govern that term, the Board may:23        (1) continue the existing term, with or without 24    modifying or enlarging the conditions; or25        (1.5) for those released as a result of youthful   HB3424- 45 -LRB104 08148 RLC 18196 b1    offender parole as set forth in Section 5-4.5-115 of this 2    Code, order that the inmate be subsequently rereleased to 3    serve a specified mandatory supervised release term not to 4    exceed the full term permitted under the provisions of 5    Section 5-4.5-115 and subsection (d) of Section 5-8-1 of 6    this Code and may modify or enlarge the conditions of the 7    release as the Board deems proper; or 8        (2) parole or release the person to a half-way house; 9    or10        (3) revoke the parole or mandatory supervised release 11    and reconfine the person for a term computed in the 12    following manner:13            (i) (A) For those sentenced under the law in 14        effect prior to this amendatory Act of 1977, the 15        recommitment shall be for any portion of the imposed 16        maximum term of imprisonment or confinement which had 17        not been served at the time of parole and the parole 18        term, less the time elapsed between the parole of the 19        person and the commission of the violation for which 20        parole was revoked;21            (B) Except as set forth in paragraphs (C) and (D), 22        for those subject to mandatory supervised release 23        under paragraph (d) of Section 5-8-1 of this Code, the 24        recommitment shall be for the total mandatory 25        supervised release term, less the time elapsed between 26        the release of the person and the commission of the   HB3424- 46 -LRB104 08148 RLC 18196 b1        violation for which mandatory supervised release is 2        revoked. The Board may also order that a prisoner 3        serve up to one year of the sentence imposed by the 4        court which was not served due to the accumulation of 5        sentence credit;6            (C) For those subject to sex offender supervision 7        under clause (d)(4) of Section 5-8-1 of this Code, the 8        reconfinement period for violations of clauses (a)(3) 9        through (b-1)(15) of Section 3-3-7 shall not exceed 2 10        years from the date of reconfinement; 11            (D) For those released as a result of youthful 12        offender parole as set forth in Section 5-4.5-115 of 13        this Code, the reconfinement period shall be for the 14        total mandatory supervised release term, less the time 15        elapsed between the release of the person and the 16        commission of the violation for which mandatory 17        supervised release is revoked. The Board may also 18        order that a prisoner serve up to one year of the 19        mandatory supervised release term previously earned. 20        The Board may also order that the inmate be 21        subsequently rereleased to serve a specified mandatory 22        supervised release term not to exceed the full term 23        permitted under the provisions of Section 5-4.5-115 24        and subsection (d) of Section 5-8-1 of this Code and 25        may modify or enlarge the conditions of the release as 26        the Board deems proper;   HB3424- 47 -LRB104 08148 RLC 18196 b1             (ii) the person shall be given credit against the 2        term of reimprisonment or reconfinement for time spent 3        in custody since he or she was paroled or released 4        which has not been credited against another sentence 5        or period of confinement;6             (iii) (blank);7             (iv) this Section is subject to the release under 8        supervision and the reparole and rerelease provisions 9        of Section 3-3-10.10    (b) The Board may revoke parole or mandatory supervised 11release for violation of a condition for the duration of the 12term and for any further period which is reasonably necessary 13for the adjudication of matters arising before its expiration. 14The issuance of a warrant of arrest for an alleged violation of 15the conditions of parole or mandatory supervised release shall 16toll the running of the term until the final determination of 17the charge. When parole or mandatory supervised release is not 18revoked that period shall be credited to the term, unless a 19community-based sanction is imposed as an alternative to 20revocation and reincarceration, including a diversion 21established by the Illinois Department of Corrections Parole 22Services Unit prior to the holding of a preliminary parole 23revocation hearing. Parolees who are diverted to a 24community-based sanction shall serve the entire term of parole 25or mandatory supervised release, if otherwise appropriate.26    (b-5) The Board shall revoke parole or mandatory   HB3424- 48 -LRB104 08148 RLC 18196 b1supervised release for violation of the conditions prescribed 2in paragraph (7.6) of subsection (a) of Section 3-3-7.3    (c) A person charged with violating a condition of parole 4or mandatory supervised release shall have a preliminary 5hearing before a hearing officer designated by the Board to 6determine if there is cause to hold the person for a revocation 7hearing. However, no preliminary hearing need be held when 8revocation is based upon new criminal charges and a court 9finds probable cause on the new criminal charges or when the 10revocation is based upon a new criminal conviction and a 11certified copy of that conviction is available.12    (d) Parole or mandatory supervised release shall not be 13revoked without written notice to the offender setting forth 14the violation of parole or mandatory supervised release 15charged against him or her. Before the Board makes a decision 16on whether to revoke an offender's parole or mandatory 17supervised release, the Prisoner Review Board must run a LEADS 18report. The Board shall publish on the Board's publicly 19accessible website the name and identification number of 20offenders alleged to have violated terms of parole or 21mandatory supervised release, the Board's decision whether to 22revoke parole or mandatory supervised release, and the names 23of the voting Board members. This information shall only be 24accessible while the offender is in State custody. 25    (e) A hearing on revocation shall be conducted before at 26least one member of the Prisoner Review Board. The Board shall   HB3424- 49 -LRB104 08148 RLC 18196 b1may meet and order its actions in panels of 3 or more members. 2The action of a majority of the panel shall be the action of 3the Board. A record of the hearing shall be made. The victim of 4the underlying offense shall be notified of the hearing prior 5to the hearing and be afforded the opportunity to provide a 6statement. The victim's statement shall be considered by the 7Board. At the hearing the offender shall be permitted to:8        (1) appear and answer the charge; and9        (2) bring witnesses on his or her behalf.10    (f) The Board shall either revoke parole or mandatory 11supervised release or order the person's term continued with 12or without modification or enlargement of the conditions. The 13victim of the underlying offense shall be notified of the 14Board's decision. 15    (g) Parole or mandatory supervised release shall not be 16revoked for failure to make payments under the conditions of 17parole or release unless the Board determines that such 18failure is due to the offender's willful refusal to pay.19(Source: P.A. 100-1182, eff. 6-1-19; 101-288, eff. 1-1-20.) 20    (730 ILCS 5/3-14-1)  (from Ch. 38, par. 1003-14-1)21    Sec. 3-14-1. Release from the institution. 22    (a) Upon release of a person on parole, mandatory release, 23final discharge, or pardon, the Department shall return all 24property held for him, provide him with suitable clothing and 25procure necessary transportation for him to his designated   HB3424- 50 -LRB104 08148 RLC 18196 b1place of residence and employment. It may provide such person 2with a grant of money for travel and expenses which may be paid 3in installments. The amount of the money grant shall be 4determined by the Department.5    (a-1) The Department shall, before a wrongfully imprisoned 6person, as defined in Section 3-1-2 of this Code, is 7discharged from the Department, provide him or her with any 8documents necessary after discharge. 9    (a-2) The Department of Corrections may establish and 10maintain, in any institution it administers, revolving funds 11to be known as "Travel and Allowances Revolving Funds". These 12revolving funds shall be used for advancing travel and expense 13allowances to committed, paroled, and discharged prisoners. 14The moneys paid into such revolving funds shall be from 15appropriations to the Department for Committed, Paroled, and 16Discharged Prisoners.17    (a-3) Upon release of a person who is eligible to vote on 18parole, mandatory release, final discharge, or pardon, the 19Department shall provide the person with a form that informs 20him or her that his or her voting rights have been restored and 21a voter registration application. The Department shall have 22available voter registration applications in the languages 23provided by the Illinois State Board of Elections. The form 24that informs the person that his or her rights have been 25restored shall include the following information:26        (1) All voting rights are restored upon release from   HB3424- 51 -LRB104 08148 RLC 18196 b1    the Department's custody.2        (2) A person who is eligible to vote must register in 3    order to be able to vote. 4    The Department of Corrections shall confirm that the 5person received the voter registration application and has 6been informed that his or her voting rights have been 7restored. 8    (a-4) Prior to release of a person on parole, mandatory 9supervised release, final discharge, or pardon, the Department 10shall screen every person for Medicaid eligibility. Officials 11of the correctional institution or facility where the 12committed person is assigned shall assist an eligible person 13to complete a Medicaid application to ensure that the person 14begins receiving benefits as soon as possible after his or her 15release. The application must include the eligible person's 16address associated with his or her residence upon release from 17the facility. If the residence is temporary, the eligible 18person must notify the Department of Human Services of his or 19her change in address upon transition to permanent housing. 20    (b) (Blank).21    (c) Except as otherwise provided in this Code, the 22Department shall establish procedures to provide written 23notification of any release of any person who has been 24convicted of a felony to the State's Attorney and sheriff of 25the county from which the offender was committed, and the 26State's Attorney and sheriff of the county into which the   HB3424- 52 -LRB104 08148 RLC 18196 b1offender is to be paroled or released. Except as otherwise 2provided in this Code, the Department shall establish 3procedures to provide written notification to the proper law 4enforcement agency for any municipality of any release of any 5person who has been convicted of a felony if the arrest of the 6offender or the commission of the offense took place in the 7municipality, if the offender is to be paroled or released 8into the municipality, or if the offender resided in the 9municipality at the time of the commission of the offense. If a 10person convicted of a felony who is in the custody of the 11Department of Corrections or on parole or mandatory supervised 12release informs the Department that he or she has resided, 13resides, or will reside at an address that is a housing 14facility owned, managed, operated, or leased by a public 15housing agency, the Department must send written notification 16of that information to the public housing agency that owns, 17manages, operates, or leases the housing facility. The written 18notification shall, when possible, be given at least 14 days 19before release of the person from custody, or as soon 20thereafter as possible. The written notification shall be 21provided electronically if the State's Attorney, sheriff, 22proper law enforcement agency, or public housing agency has 23provided the Department with an accurate and up to date email 24address. 25    (c-1) (Blank).26    (c-2) The Department shall establish procedures to provide   HB3424- 53 -LRB104 08148 RLC 18196 b1notice to the Illinois State Police of the release or 2discharge of persons convicted of violations of the 3Methamphetamine Control and Community Protection Act or a 4violation of the Methamphetamine Precursor Control Act. The 5Illinois State Police shall make this information available to 6local, State, or federal law enforcement agencies upon 7request.8    (c-5) If a person on parole or mandatory supervised 9release becomes a resident of a facility licensed or regulated 10by the Department of Public Health, the Illinois Department of 11Public Aid, or the Illinois Department of Human Services, the 12Department of Corrections shall provide copies of the 13following information to the appropriate licensing or 14regulating Department and the licensed or regulated facility 15where the person becomes a resident:16        (1) The mittimus and any pre-sentence investigation 17    reports.18        (2) The social evaluation prepared pursuant to Section 19    3-8-2.20        (3) Any pre-release evaluation conducted pursuant to 21    subsection (j) of Section 3-6-2.22        (4) Reports of disciplinary infractions and 23    dispositions.24        (5) Any parole plan, including orders issued by the 25    Prisoner Review Board, and any violation reports and 26    dispositions.  HB3424- 54 -LRB104 08148 RLC 18196 b1        (6) The name and contact information for the assigned 2    parole agent and parole supervisor. 3    This information shall be provided within 3 days of the 4person becoming a resident of the facility. 5    (c-10) If a person on parole or mandatory supervised 6release becomes a resident of a facility licensed or regulated 7by the Department of Public Health, the Illinois Department of 8Public Aid, or the Illinois Department of Human Services, the 9Department of Corrections shall provide written notification 10of such residence to the following:11        (1) The Prisoner Review Board.12        (2) The chief of police and sheriff in the 13    municipality and county in which the licensed facility is 14    located.15    The notification shall be provided within 3 days of the 16person becoming a resident of the facility. 17    (d) Upon the release of a committed person on parole, 18mandatory supervised release, final discharge, or pardon, the 19Department shall provide such person with information 20concerning programs and services of the Illinois Department of 21Public Health to ascertain whether such person has been 22exposed to the human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) or any 23identified causative agent of Acquired Immunodeficiency 24Syndrome (AIDS).25    (e) Upon the release of a committed person on parole, 26mandatory supervised release, final discharge, pardon, or who   HB3424- 55 -LRB104 08148 RLC 18196 b1has been wrongfully imprisoned, the Department shall verify 2the released person's full name, date of birth, and social 3security number. If verification is made by the Department by 4obtaining a certified copy of the released person's birth 5certificate and the released person's social security card or 6other documents authorized by the Secretary, the Department 7shall provide the birth certificate and social security card 8or other documents authorized by the Secretary to the released 9person. If verification by the Department is done by means 10other than obtaining a certified copy of the released person's 11birth certificate and the released person's social security 12card or other documents authorized by the Secretary, the 13Department shall complete a verification form, prescribed by 14the Secretary of State, and shall provide that verification 15form to the released person.16    (f) Forty-five days prior to the scheduled discharge of a 17person committed to the custody of the Department of 18Corrections, the Department shall give the person:19        (1) who is otherwise uninsured an opportunity to apply 20    for health care coverage including medical assistance 21    under Article V of the Illinois Public Aid Code in 22    accordance with subsection (b) of Section 1-8.5 of the 23    Illinois Public Aid Code, and the Department of 24    Corrections shall provide assistance with completion of 25    the application for health care coverage including medical 26    assistance;  HB3424- 56 -LRB104 08148 RLC 18196 b1        (2) information about obtaining a standard Illinois 2    Identification Card or a limited-term Illinois 3    Identification Card under Section 4 of the Illinois 4    Identification Card Act if the person has not been issued 5    an Illinois Identification Card under subsection (a-20) of 6    Section 4 of the Illinois Identification Card Act;7        (3) information about voter registration and may 8    distribute information prepared by the State Board of 9    Elections. The Department of Corrections may enter into an 10    interagency contract with the State Board of Elections to 11    participate in the automatic voter registration program 12    and be a designated automatic voter registration agency 13    under Section 1A-16.2 of the Election Code;14        (4) information about job listings upon discharge from 15    the correctional institution or facility;16        (5) information about available housing upon discharge 17    from the correctional institution or facility;18        (6) a directory of elected State officials and of 19    officials elected in the county and municipality, if any, 20    in which the committed person intends to reside upon 21    discharge from the correctional institution or facility; 22    and23        (7) any other information that the Department of 24    Corrections deems necessary to provide the committed 25    person in order for the committed person to reenter the 26    community and avoid recidivism.   HB3424- 57 -LRB104 08148 RLC 18196 b1    (g) Sixty days before the scheduled discharge of a person 2committed to the custody of the Department or upon receipt of 3the person's certified birth certificate and social security 4card as set forth in subsection (d) of Section 3-8-1 of this 5Act, whichever occurs later, the Department shall transmit an 6application for an Identification Card to the Secretary of 7State, in accordance with subsection (a-20) of Section 4 of 8the Illinois Identification Card Act.9    (h) Notification of an offender's release must be made for 10those offenders who are being released after serving a 11sentence for domestic battery, aggravated domestic battery, or 12violation of an order of protection or who have previous 13convictions for domestic battery, aggravated domestic battery, 14or violation of an order of protection. For those persons 15being released after serving a sentence for domestic battery, 16aggravated domestic battery, or violation of an order of 17protection the Department of Corrections shall notify, in 18writing, the victim of the offense committed by the offender, 19the law enforcement agencies and State's Attorneys' offices of 20the county of conviction and the county where the offender 21expects to reside not less than 30 days before the offender's 22release. For those being released who have previous 23convictions for domestic battery, aggravated domestic battery 24or violation of an order of protection, the Department shall 25notify in writing the victim of those previous offenses, if 26contact information is known, the law enforcement agencies and   HB3424- 58 -LRB104 08148 RLC 18196 b1State's Attorneys' offices of the county of conviction and the 2county where the offender expects to reside not less than 30 3days before the offender's release. 4    The Department may adopt rules to implement this Section.5(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 6102-606, eff. 1-1-22; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-345, eff. 71-1-24.) 8    Section 15. The Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 1986 is 9amended by changing Section 214 as follows: 10    (750 ILCS 60/214)  (from Ch. 40, par. 2312-14)11    Sec. 214. Order of protection; remedies. 12    (a) Issuance of order. If the court finds that petitioner 13has been abused by a family or household member or that 14petitioner is a high-risk adult who has been abused, 15neglected, or exploited, as defined in this Act, an order of 16protection prohibiting the abuse, neglect, or exploitation 17shall issue; provided that petitioner must also satisfy the 18requirements of one of the following Sections, as appropriate: 19Section 217 on emergency orders, Section 218 on interim 20orders, or Section 219 on plenary orders. Petitioner shall not 21be denied an order of protection because petitioner or 22respondent is a minor. The court, when determining whether or 23not to issue an order of protection, shall not require 24physical manifestations of abuse on the person of the victim.   HB3424- 59 -LRB104 08148 RLC 18196 b1Modification and extension of prior orders of protection shall 2be in accordance with this Act.3    (b) Remedies and standards. The remedies to be included in 4an order of protection shall be determined in accordance with 5this Section and one of the following Sections, as 6appropriate: Section 217 on emergency orders, Section 218 on 7interim orders, and Section 219 on plenary orders. The 8remedies listed in this subsection shall be in addition to 9other civil or criminal remedies available to petitioner.10        (1) Prohibition of abuse, neglect, or exploitation. 11    Prohibit respondent's harassment, interference with 12    personal liberty, intimidation of a dependent, physical 13    abuse, or willful deprivation, neglect or exploitation, as 14    defined in this Act, or stalking of the petitioner, as 15    defined in Section 12-7.3 of the Criminal Code of 2012, if 16    such abuse, neglect, exploitation, or stalking has 17    occurred or otherwise appears likely to occur if not 18    prohibited.19        (2) Grant of exclusive possession of residence. 20    Prohibit respondent from entering or remaining in any 21    residence, household, or premises of the petitioner, 22    including one owned or leased by respondent, if petitioner 23    has a right to occupancy thereof. The grant of exclusive 24    possession of the residence, household, or premises shall 25    not affect title to real property, nor shall the court be 26    limited by the standard set forth in subsection (c-2) of   HB3424- 60 -LRB104 08148 RLC 18196 b1    Section 501 of the Illinois Marriage and Dissolution of 2    Marriage Act.3            (A) Right to occupancy. A party has a right to 4        occupancy of a residence or household if it is solely 5        or jointly owned or leased by that party, that party's 6        spouse, a person with a legal duty to support that 7        party or a minor child in that party's care, or by any 8        person or entity other than the opposing party that 9        authorizes that party's occupancy (e.g., a domestic 10        violence shelter). Standards set forth in subparagraph 11        (B) shall not preclude equitable relief.12            (B) Presumption of hardships. If petitioner and 13        respondent each has the right to occupancy of a 14        residence or household, the court shall balance (i) 15        the hardships to respondent and any minor child or 16        dependent adult in respondent's care resulting from 17        entry of this remedy with (ii) the hardships to 18        petitioner and any minor child or dependent adult in 19        petitioner's care resulting from continued exposure to 20        the risk of abuse (should petitioner remain at the 21        residence or household) or from loss of possession of 22        the residence or household (should petitioner leave to 23        avoid the risk of abuse). When determining the balance 24        of hardships, the court shall also take into account 25        the accessibility of the residence or household. 26        Hardships need not be balanced if respondent does not   HB3424- 61 -LRB104 08148 RLC 18196 b1        have a right to occupancy.2            The balance of hardships is presumed to favor 3        possession by petitioner unless the presumption is 4        rebutted by a preponderance of the evidence, showing 5        that the hardships to respondent substantially 6        outweigh the hardships to petitioner and any minor 7        child or dependent adult in petitioner's care. The 8        court, on the request of petitioner or on its own 9        motion, may order respondent to provide suitable, 10        accessible, alternate housing for petitioner instead 11        of excluding respondent from a mutual residence or 12        household.13        (3) Stay away order and additional prohibitions. Order 14    respondent to stay away from petitioner or any other 15    person protected by the order of protection, or prohibit 16    respondent from entering or remaining present at 17    petitioner's school, place of employment, or other 18    specified places at times when petitioner is present, or 19    both, if reasonable, given the balance of hardships. 20    Hardships need not be balanced for the court to enter a 21    stay away order or prohibit entry if respondent has no 22    right to enter the premises.23            (A) If an order of protection grants petitioner 24        exclusive possession of the residence, or prohibits 25        respondent from entering the residence, or orders 26        respondent to stay away from petitioner or other   HB3424- 62 -LRB104 08148 RLC 18196 b1        protected persons, then the court may allow respondent 2        access to the residence to remove items of clothing 3        and personal adornment used exclusively by respondent, 4        medications, and other items as the court directs. The 5        right to access shall be exercised on only one 6        occasion as the court directs and in the presence of an 7        agreed-upon adult third party or law enforcement 8        officer.9            (B) When the petitioner and the respondent attend 10        the same public, private, or non-public elementary, 11        middle, or high school, the court when issuing an 12        order of protection and providing relief shall 13        consider the severity of the act, any continuing 14        physical danger or emotional distress to the 15        petitioner, the educational rights guaranteed to the 16        petitioner and respondent under federal and State law, 17        the availability of a transfer of the respondent to 18        another school, a change of placement or a change of 19        program of the respondent, the expense, difficulty, 20        and educational disruption that would be caused by a 21        transfer of the respondent to another school, and any 22        other relevant facts of the case. The court may order 23        that the respondent not attend the public, private, or 24        non-public elementary, middle, or high school attended 25        by the petitioner, order that the respondent accept a 26        change of placement or change of program, as   HB3424- 63 -LRB104 08148 RLC 18196 b1        determined by the school district or private or 2        non-public school, or place restrictions on the 3        respondent's movements within the school attended by 4        the petitioner. The respondent bears the burden of 5        proving by a preponderance of the evidence that a 6        transfer, change of placement, or change of program of 7        the respondent is not available. The respondent also 8        bears the burden of production with respect to the 9        expense, difficulty, and educational disruption that 10        would be caused by a transfer of the respondent to 11        another school. A transfer, change of placement, or 12        change of program is not unavailable to the respondent 13        solely on the ground that the respondent does not 14        agree with the school district's or private or 15        non-public school's transfer, change of placement, or 16        change of program or solely on the ground that the 17        respondent fails or refuses to consent or otherwise 18        does not take an action required to effectuate a 19        transfer, change of placement, or change of program. 20        When a court orders a respondent to stay away from the 21        public, private, or non-public school attended by the 22        petitioner and the respondent requests a transfer to 23        another attendance center within the respondent's 24        school district or private or non-public school, the 25        school district or private or non-public school shall 26        have sole discretion to determine the attendance   HB3424- 64 -LRB104 08148 RLC 18196 b1        center to which the respondent is transferred. In the 2        event the court order results in a transfer of the 3        minor respondent to another attendance center, a 4        change in the respondent's placement, or a change of 5        the respondent's program, the parents, guardian, or 6        legal custodian of the respondent is responsible for 7        transportation and other costs associated with the 8        transfer or change. 9            (C) The court may order the parents, guardian, or 10        legal custodian of a minor respondent to take certain 11        actions or to refrain from taking certain actions to 12        ensure that the respondent complies with the order. In 13        the event the court orders a transfer of the 14        respondent to another school, the parents, guardian, 15        or legal custodian of the respondent is responsible 16        for transportation and other costs associated with the 17        change of school by the respondent. 18        (4) Counseling. Require or recommend the respondent to 19    undergo counseling for a specified duration with a social 20    worker, psychologist, clinical psychologist, 21    psychiatrist, family service agency, alcohol or substance 22    abuse program, mental health center guidance counselor, 23    agency providing services to elders, program designed for 24    domestic violence abusers or any other guidance service 25    the court deems appropriate. The Court may order the 26    respondent in any intimate partner relationship to report   HB3424- 65 -LRB104 08148 RLC 18196 b1    to an Illinois Department of Human Services protocol 2    approved partner abuse intervention program for an 3    assessment and to follow all recommended treatment. 4        (5) Physical care and possession of the minor child. 5    In order to protect the minor child from abuse, neglect, 6    or unwarranted separation from the person who has been the 7    minor child's primary caretaker, or to otherwise protect 8    the well-being of the minor child, the court may do either 9    or both of the following: (i) grant petitioner physical 10    care or possession of the minor child, or both, or (ii) 11    order respondent to return a minor child to, or not remove 12    a minor child from, the physical care of a parent or person 13    in loco parentis.14        If a court finds, after a hearing, that respondent has 15    committed abuse (as defined in Section 103) of a minor 16    child, there shall be a rebuttable presumption that 17    awarding physical care to respondent would not be in the 18    minor child's best interest.19        (6) Temporary allocation of parental responsibilities: 20    significant decision-making. Award temporary 21    decision-making responsibility to petitioner in accordance 22    with this Section, the Illinois Marriage and Dissolution 23    of Marriage Act, the Illinois Parentage Act of 2015, and 24    this State's Uniform Child-Custody Jurisdiction and 25    Enforcement Act. 26        If a court finds, after a hearing, that respondent has   HB3424- 66 -LRB104 08148 RLC 18196 b1    committed abuse (as defined in Section 103) of a minor 2    child, there shall be a rebuttable presumption that 3    awarding temporary significant decision-making 4    responsibility to respondent would not be in the child's 5    best interest.6        (7) Parenting time. Determine the parenting time, if 7    any, of respondent in any case in which the court awards 8    physical care or allocates temporary significant 9    decision-making responsibility of a minor child to 10    petitioner. The court shall restrict or deny respondent's 11    parenting time with a minor child if the court finds that 12    respondent has done or is likely to do any of the 13    following: (i) abuse or endanger the minor child during 14    parenting time; (ii) use the parenting time as an 15    opportunity to abuse or harass petitioner or petitioner's 16    family or household members; (iii) improperly conceal or 17    detain the minor child; or (iv) otherwise act in a manner 18    that is not in the best interests of the minor child. The 19    court shall not be limited by the standards set forth in 20    Section 603.10 of the Illinois Marriage and Dissolution of 21    Marriage Act. If the court grants parenting time, the 22    order shall specify dates and times for the parenting time 23    to take place or other specific parameters or conditions 24    that are appropriate. No order for parenting time shall 25    refer merely to the term "reasonable parenting time".26        Petitioner may deny respondent access to the minor   HB3424- 67 -LRB104 08148 RLC 18196 b1    child if, when respondent arrives for parenting time, 2    respondent is under the influence of drugs or alcohol and 3    constitutes a threat to the safety and well-being of 4    petitioner or petitioner's minor children or is behaving 5    in a violent or abusive manner.6        If necessary to protect any member of petitioner's 7    family or household from future abuse, respondent shall be 8    prohibited from coming to petitioner's residence to meet 9    the minor child for parenting time, and the parties shall 10    submit to the court their recommendations for reasonable 11    alternative arrangements for parenting time. A person may 12    be approved to supervise parenting time only after filing 13    an affidavit accepting that responsibility and 14    acknowledging accountability to the court.15        (8) Removal or concealment of minor child. Prohibit 16    respondent from removing a minor child from the State or 17    concealing the child within the State. 18        (9) Order to appear. Order the respondent to appear in 19    court, alone or with a minor child, to prevent abuse, 20    neglect, removal or concealment of the child, to return 21    the child to the custody or care of the petitioner or to 22    permit any court-ordered interview or examination of the 23    child or the respondent.24        (10) Possession of personal property. Grant petitioner 25    exclusive possession of personal property and, if 26    respondent has possession or control, direct respondent to   HB3424- 68 -LRB104 08148 RLC 18196 b1    promptly make it available to petitioner, if:2            (i) petitioner, but not respondent, owns the 3        property; or4            (ii) the parties own the property jointly; sharing 5        it would risk abuse of petitioner by respondent or is 6        impracticable; and the balance of hardships favors 7        temporary possession by petitioner.8        If petitioner's sole claim to ownership of the 9    property is that it is marital property, the court may 10    award petitioner temporary possession thereof under the 11    standards of subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph only if a 12    proper proceeding has been filed under the Illinois 13    Marriage and Dissolution of Marriage Act, as now or 14    hereafter amended.15        No order under this provision shall affect title to 16    property.17        (11) Protection of property. Forbid the respondent 18    from taking, transferring, encumbering, concealing, 19    damaging or otherwise disposing of any real or personal 20    property, except as explicitly authorized by the court, 21    if:22            (i) petitioner, but not respondent, owns the 23        property; or24            (ii) the parties own the property jointly, and the 25        balance of hardships favors granting this remedy.26        If petitioner's sole claim to ownership of the   HB3424- 69 -LRB104 08148 RLC 18196 b1    property is that it is marital property, the court may 2    grant petitioner relief under subparagraph (ii) of this 3    paragraph only if a proper proceeding has been filed under 4    the Illinois Marriage and Dissolution of Marriage Act, as 5    now or hereafter amended.6        The court may further prohibit respondent from 7    improperly using the financial or other resources of an 8    aged member of the family or household for the profit or 9    advantage of respondent or of any other person.10        (11.5) Protection of animals. Grant the petitioner the 11    exclusive care, custody, or control of any animal owned, 12    possessed, leased, kept, or held by either the petitioner 13    or the respondent or a minor child residing in the 14    residence or household of either the petitioner or the 15    respondent and order the respondent to stay away from the 16    animal and forbid the respondent from taking, 17    transferring, encumbering, concealing, harming, or 18    otherwise disposing of the animal. 19        (12) Order for payment of support. Order respondent to 20    pay temporary support for the petitioner or any child in 21    the petitioner's care or over whom the petitioner has been 22    allocated parental responsibility, when the respondent has 23    a legal obligation to support that person, in accordance 24    with the Illinois Marriage and Dissolution of Marriage 25    Act, which shall govern, among other matters, the amount 26    of support, payment through the clerk and withholding of   HB3424- 70 -LRB104 08148 RLC 18196 b1    income to secure payment. An order for child support may 2    be granted to a petitioner with lawful physical care of a 3    child, or an order or agreement for physical care of a 4    child, prior to entry of an order allocating significant 5    decision-making responsibility. Such a support order shall 6    expire upon entry of a valid order allocating parental 7    responsibility differently and vacating the petitioner's 8    significant decision-making authority, unless otherwise 9    provided in the order.10        (13) Order for payment of losses. Order respondent to 11    pay petitioner for losses suffered as a direct result of 12    the abuse, neglect, or exploitation. Such losses shall 13    include, but not be limited to, medical expenses, lost 14    earnings or other support, repair or replacement of 15    property damaged or taken, reasonable attorney's fees, 16    court costs and moving or other travel expenses, including 17    additional reasonable expenses for temporary shelter and 18    restaurant meals.19            (i) Losses affecting family needs. If a party is 20        entitled to seek maintenance, child support or 21        property distribution from the other party under the 22        Illinois Marriage and Dissolution of Marriage Act, as 23        now or hereafter amended, the court may order 24        respondent to reimburse petitioner's actual losses, to 25        the extent that such reimbursement would be 26        "appropriate temporary relief", as authorized by   HB3424- 71 -LRB104 08148 RLC 18196 b1        subsection (a)(3) of Section 501 of that Act.2            (ii) Recovery of expenses. In the case of an 3        improper concealment or removal of a minor child, the 4        court may order respondent to pay the reasonable 5        expenses incurred or to be incurred in the search for 6        and recovery of the minor child, including but not 7        limited to legal fees, court costs, private 8        investigator fees, and travel costs.9        (14) Prohibition of entry. Prohibit the respondent 10    from entering or remaining in the residence or household 11    while the respondent is under the influence of alcohol or 12    drugs and constitutes a threat to the safety and 13    well-being of the petitioner or the petitioner's children.14        (14.5) Prohibition of firearm possession.15            (a) Prohibit a respondent against whom an order of 16        protection was issued from possessing any firearms 17        during the duration of the order if the order:18                (1) was issued after a hearing of which such 19            person received actual notice, and at which such 20            person had an opportunity to participate;21                (2) restrains such person from harassing, 22            stalking, or threatening an intimate partner of 23            such person or child of such intimate partner or 24            person, or engaging in other conduct that would 25            place an intimate partner in reasonable fear of 26            bodily injury to the partner or child; and  HB3424- 72 -LRB104 08148 RLC 18196 b1                (3)(i) includes a finding that such person 2            represents a credible threat to the physical 3            safety of such intimate partner or child; or (ii) 4            by its terms explicitly prohibits the use, 5            attempted use, or threatened use of physical force 6            against such intimate partner or child that would 7            reasonably be expected to cause bodily injury.8        Any Firearm Owner's Identification Card in the 9        possession of the respondent, except as provided in 10        subsection (b), shall be ordered by the court to be 11        turned over to the local law enforcement agency. The 12        local law enforcement agency shall immediately mail 13        the card to the Illinois State Police Firearm Owner's 14        Identification Card Office for safekeeping. The court 15        shall issue a warrant for seizure of any firearm in the 16        possession of the respondent, to be kept by the local 17        law enforcement agency for safekeeping, except as 18        provided in subsection (b). The period of safekeeping 19        shall be for the duration of the order of protection. 20        The firearm or firearms and Firearm Owner's 21        Identification Card, if unexpired, shall at the 22        respondent's request, be returned to the respondent at 23        the end of the order of protection. It is the 24        respondent's responsibility to notify the Illinois 25        State Police Firearm Owner's Identification Card 26        Office.   HB3424- 73 -LRB104 08148 RLC 18196 b1            (b) If the respondent is a peace officer as 2        defined in Section 2-13 of the Criminal Code of 2012, 3        the court shall order that any firearms used by the 4        respondent in the performance of his or her duties as a 5        peace officer be surrendered to the chief law 6        enforcement executive of the agency in which the 7        respondent is employed, who shall retain the firearms 8        for safekeeping for the duration of the order of 9        protection.10            (c) Upon expiration of the period of safekeeping, 11        if the firearms or Firearm Owner's Identification Card 12        cannot be returned to respondent because respondent 13        cannot be located, fails to respond to requests to 14        retrieve the firearms, or is not lawfully eligible to 15        possess a firearm, upon petition from the local law 16        enforcement agency, the court may order the local law 17        enforcement agency to destroy the firearms, use the 18        firearms for training purposes, or for any other 19        application as deemed appropriate by the local law 20        enforcement agency; or that the firearms be turned 21        over to a third party who is lawfully eligible to 22        possess firearms, and who does not reside with 23        respondent. 24        (15) Prohibition of access to records. If an order of 25    protection prohibits respondent from having contact with 26    the minor child, or if petitioner's address is omitted   HB3424- 74 -LRB104 08148 RLC 18196 b1    under subsection (b) of Section 203, or if necessary to 2    prevent abuse or wrongful removal or concealment of a 3    minor child, the order shall deny respondent access to, 4    and prohibit respondent from inspecting, obtaining, or 5    attempting to inspect or obtain, school or any other 6    records of the minor child who is in the care of 7    petitioner.8        (16) Order for payment of shelter services. Order 9    respondent to reimburse a shelter providing temporary 10    housing and counseling services to the petitioner for the 11    cost of the services, as certified by the shelter and 12    deemed reasonable by the court.13        (17) Order for injunctive relief. Enter injunctive 14    relief necessary or appropriate to prevent further abuse 15    of a family or household member or further abuse, neglect, 16    or exploitation of a high-risk adult with disabilities or 17    to effectuate one of the granted remedies, if supported by 18    the balance of hardships. If the harm to be prevented by 19    the injunction is abuse or any other harm that one of the 20    remedies listed in paragraphs (1) through (16) of this 21    subsection is designed to prevent, no further evidence is 22    necessary that the harm is an irreparable injury.23        (18) Telephone services.24            (A) Unless a condition described in subparagraph 25        (B) of this paragraph exists, the court may, upon 26        request by the petitioner, order a wireless telephone   HB3424- 75 -LRB104 08148 RLC 18196 b1        service provider to transfer to the petitioner the 2        right to continue to use a telephone number or numbers 3        indicated by the petitioner and the financial 4        responsibility associated with the number or numbers, 5        as set forth in subparagraph (C) of this paragraph. 6        For purposes of this paragraph (18), the term 7        "wireless telephone service provider" means a provider 8        of commercial mobile service as defined in 47 U.S.C. 9        332. The petitioner may request the transfer of each 10        telephone number that the petitioner, or a minor child 11        in his or her custody, uses. The clerk of the court 12        shall serve the order on the wireless telephone 13        service provider's agent for service of process 14        provided to the Illinois Commerce Commission. The 15        order shall contain all of the following:16                (i) The name and billing telephone number of 17            the account holder including the name of the 18            wireless telephone service provider that serves 19            the account.20                (ii) Each telephone number that will be 21            transferred.22                (iii) A statement that the provider transfers 23            to the petitioner all financial responsibility for 24            and right to the use of any telephone number 25            transferred under this paragraph.26            (B) A wireless telephone service provider shall   HB3424- 76 -LRB104 08148 RLC 18196 b1        terminate the respondent's use of, and shall transfer 2        to the petitioner use of, the telephone number or 3        numbers indicated in subparagraph (A) of this 4        paragraph unless it notifies the petitioner, within 72 5        hours after it receives the order, that one of the 6        following applies:7                (i) The account holder named in the order has 8            terminated the account.9                (ii) A difference in network technology would 10            prevent or impair the functionality of a device on 11            a network if the transfer occurs.12                (iii) The transfer would cause a geographic or 13            other limitation on network or service provision 14            to the petitioner.15                (iv) Another technological or operational 16            issue would prevent or impair the use of the 17            telephone number if the transfer occurs.18            (C) The petitioner assumes all financial 19        responsibility for and right to the use of any 20        telephone number transferred under this paragraph. In 21        this paragraph, "financial responsibility" includes 22        monthly service costs and costs associated with any 23        mobile device associated with the number.24            (D) A wireless telephone service provider may 25        apply to the petitioner its routine and customary 26        requirements for establishing an account or   HB3424- 77 -LRB104 08148 RLC 18196 b1        transferring a number, including requiring the 2        petitioner to provide proof of identification, 3        financial information, and customer preferences.4            (E) Except for willful or wanton misconduct, a 5        wireless telephone service provider is immune from 6        civil liability for its actions taken in compliance 7        with a court order issued under this paragraph.8            (F) All wireless service providers that provide 9        services to residential customers shall provide to the 10        Illinois Commerce Commission the name and address of 11        an agent for service of orders entered under this 12        paragraph (18). Any change in status of the registered 13        agent must be reported to the Illinois Commerce 14        Commission within 30 days of such change. 15            (G) The Illinois Commerce Commission shall 16        maintain the list of registered agents for service for 17        each wireless telephone service provider on the 18        Commission's website. The Commission may consult with 19        wireless telephone service providers and the Circuit 20        Court Clerks on the manner in which this information 21        is provided and displayed. 22    (c) Relevant factors; findings.23        (1) In determining whether to grant a specific remedy, 24    other than payment of support, the court shall consider 25    relevant factors, including but not limited to the 26    following:  HB3424- 78 -LRB104 08148 RLC 18196 b1            (i) the nature, frequency, severity, pattern and 2        consequences of the respondent's past abuse, neglect 3        or exploitation of the petitioner or any family or 4        household member, including the concealment of his or 5        her location in order to evade service of process or 6        notice, and the likelihood of danger of future abuse, 7        neglect, or exploitation to petitioner or any member 8        of petitioner's or respondent's family or household; 9        and10            (ii) the danger that any minor child will be 11        abused or neglected or improperly relocated from the 12        jurisdiction, improperly concealed within the State or 13        improperly separated from the child's primary 14        caretaker.15        (2) In comparing relative hardships resulting to the 16    parties from loss of possession of the family home, the 17    court shall consider relevant factors, including but not 18    limited to the following:19            (i) availability, accessibility, cost, safety, 20        adequacy, location and other characteristics of 21        alternate housing for each party and any minor child 22        or dependent adult in the party's care;23            (ii) the effect on the party's employment; and24            (iii) the effect on the relationship of the party, 25        and any minor child or dependent adult in the party's 26        care, to family, school, church and community.  HB3424- 79 -LRB104 08148 RLC 18196 b1        (3) Subject to the exceptions set forth in paragraph 2    (4) of this subsection, the court shall make its findings 3    in an official record or in writing, and shall at a minimum 4    set forth the following:5            (i) That the court has considered the applicable 6        relevant factors described in paragraphs (1) and (2) 7        of this subsection.8            (ii) Whether the conduct or actions of respondent, 9        unless prohibited, will likely cause irreparable harm 10        or continued abuse.11            (iii) Whether it is necessary to grant the 12        requested relief in order to protect petitioner or 13        other alleged abused persons.14        (4) For purposes of issuing an ex parte emergency 15    order of protection, the court, as an alternative to or as 16    a supplement to making the findings described in 17    paragraphs (c)(3)(i) through (c)(3)(iii) of this 18    subsection, may use the following procedure:19        When a verified petition for an emergency order of 20    protection in accordance with the requirements of Sections 21    203 and 217 is presented to the court, the court shall 22    examine petitioner on oath or affirmation. An emergency 23    order of protection shall be issued by the court if it 24    appears from the contents of the petition and the 25    examination of petitioner that the averments are 26    sufficient to indicate abuse by respondent and to support   HB3424- 80 -LRB104 08148 RLC 18196 b1    the granting of relief under the issuance of the emergency 2    order of protection.3        (5) Never married parties. No rights or 4    responsibilities for a minor child born outside of 5    marriage attach to a putative father until a father and 6    child relationship has been established under the Illinois 7    Parentage Act of 1984, the Illinois Parentage Act of 2015, 8    the Illinois Public Aid Code, Section 12 of the Vital 9    Records Act, the Juvenile Court Act of 1987, the Probate 10    Act of 1975, the Revised Uniform Reciprocal Enforcement of 11    Support Act, the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act, 12    the Expedited Child Support Act of 1990, any judicial, 13    administrative, or other act of another state or 14    territory, any other Illinois statute, or by any foreign 15    nation establishing the father and child relationship, any 16    other proceeding substantially in conformity with the 17    Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity 18    Reconciliation Act of 1996 (Pub. L. 104-193), or where 19    both parties appeared in open court or at an 20    administrative hearing acknowledging under oath or 21    admitting by affirmation the existence of a father and 22    child relationship. Absent such an adjudication, finding, 23    or acknowledgment, no putative father shall be granted 24    temporary allocation of parental responsibilities, 25    including parenting time with the minor child, or physical 26    care and possession of the minor child, nor shall an order   HB3424- 81 -LRB104 08148 RLC 18196 b1    of payment for support of the minor child be entered.2    (d) Balance of hardships; findings. If the court finds 3that the balance of hardships does not support the granting of 4a remedy governed by paragraph (2), (3), (10), (11), or (16) of 5subsection (b) of this Section, which may require such 6balancing, the court's findings shall so indicate and shall 7include a finding as to whether granting the remedy will 8result in hardship to respondent that would substantially 9outweigh the hardship to petitioner from denial of the remedy. 10The findings shall be an official record or in writing.11    (e) Denial of remedies. Denial of any remedy shall not be 12based, in whole or in part, on evidence that:13        (1) Respondent has cause for any use of force, unless 14    that cause satisfies the standards for justifiable use of 15    force provided by Article 7 of the Criminal Code of 2012;16        (2) Respondent was voluntarily intoxicated;17        (3) Petitioner acted in self-defense or defense of 18    another, provided that, if petitioner utilized force, such 19    force was justifiable under Article 7 of the Criminal Code 20    of 2012; 21        (4) Petitioner did not act in self-defense or defense 22    of another;23        (5) Petitioner left the residence or household to 24    avoid further abuse, neglect, or exploitation by 25    respondent;26        (6) Petitioner did not leave the residence or   HB3424- 82 -LRB104 08148 RLC 18196 b1    household to avoid further abuse, neglect, or exploitation 2    by respondent;3        (7) Conduct by any family or household member excused 4    the abuse, neglect, or exploitation by respondent, unless 5    that same conduct would have excused such abuse, neglect, 6    or exploitation if the parties had not been family or 7    household members.8    A petition for an order of protection may not be denied 9upon the basis that the petitioner or the respondent is 10incarcerated in a penal institution at the time of the filing 11of the petition. 12(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.)  HB3424- 83 -LRB104 08148 RLC 18196 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    725 ILCS 120/4.54    730 ILCS 5/3-3-1.1 new5    730 ILCS 5/3-3-2from Ch. 38, par. 1003-3-26    730 ILCS 5/3-3-9from Ch. 38, par. 1003-3-97    730 ILCS 5/3-14-1from Ch. 38, par. 1003-14-18    750 ILCS 60/214from Ch. 40, par. 2312-14